Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF10.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1037XS (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 10 Section 1. Section 483A.24, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Upon written application on forms furnished by the 3 department, the department shall issue annually without fee one 4 wild turkey license to the owner of a farm unit or to a member 5 of the ownerâs family, but not to both, and to the tenant or 6 to a member of the tenantâs family, but not to both. The wild 7 turkey hunting licenses issued shall be valid only on the 8 farm unit for which an applicant qualifies pursuant to this 9 subsection and shall be equivalent to the least restrictive 10 license issued under section 481A.38 . The owner or the tenant 11 need not reside on the farm unit to qualify for a free license 12 to hunt on that farm unit. The free turkey hunting licenses 13 issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be valid and may be 14 used during any bow or firearm turkey hunting season open 15 season using a method of take authorized for that season, 16 subject to any other restrictions that may apply, without first 17 designating a season of use for the license . Each license 18 issued under this paragraph authorizes the person issued the 19 license to harvest one wild turkey. 20